Washington statutes.
RCW 36.75.010

Definitions.

As used in this title with relation to roads and bridges, the following terms mean:

(1) "Alley," a highway not designed for general travel and primarily used as a means of access to the rear of residences and business establishments;

(2) "Board," the board of county commissioners or the county legislative authority, however organized;

(3) "Center line," the line, marked or unmarked, parallel to and equidistant from the sides of a two-way traffic roadway of a highway except where otherwise indicated by painted lines or markers;

(4) "City street," every highway or part thereof, located within the limits of incorporated cities and towns, except alleys;

(5) "County engineer" means the county road engineer, county engineer, and engineer, and shall refer to the statutorily required position of county engineer appointed under RCW 36.80.010; and may include the county director of public works when the person in that position also meets the requirements of a licensed professional engineer and is duly appointed by the county legislative authority under RCW 36.80.010;

(6) "County road," every highway or part thereof, outside the limits of incorporated cities and towns and which has not been designated as a state highway;

(7) "Department," the state department of transportation;

(8) "Director" or "secretary," the state secretary of transportation or his or her duly authorized assistant;

(9) "Pedestrian," any person afoot;

(10) "Private road or driveway," every way or place in private ownership and used for travel of vehicles by the owner or those having express or implied permission from the owner, but not by other persons;

(11) "Highway," every way, lane, road, street, boulevard, and every way or place in the state of Washington open as a matter of right to public vehicular travel both inside and outside the limits of incorporated cities and towns;

(12) "Railroad," a carrier of persons or property upon vehicles, other than streetcars, operated upon stationary rails, the route of which is principally outside incorporated cities and towns;

(13) "Roadway," the paved, improved, or proper driving portion of a highway designed or ordinarily used for vehicular travel;

(14) "Sidewalk," property between the curb lines or the lateral lines of a roadway, and the adjacent property, set aside and intended for the use of pedestrians or such portion of private property parallel and in proximity to a highway and dedicated to use by pedestrians;

(15) "State highway," includes every highway as herein defined, or part thereof, that has been designated as a state highway, or branch thereof, by legislative enactment.

[ 2005 c 161 s 1; 1984 c 7 s 26; 1975 c 62 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 182 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.75.010. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 1; RRS s 6450-1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975 c 62: "If any provision of this amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1975 c 62 s 52.]